Utah statutes.
76-9-504.   Fair reporting privilege of newspaper or broadcasting station
personnel as to public official proceedings -- Privilege as to defamatory
matter not subject to censorship.
No reporter, editor, or proprietor of any newspaper, and no owner, licensee,
or operator of a visual or sound radio broadcasting station, or network of
stations, nor the agents or employees of a newspaper or broadcasting station,
is liable to any prosecution for a fair and true report or broadcast of any
judicial, legislative, or other public official proceedings, or of any
statement, speech, argument, or debate in course of the same, except upon
proof of malice in making the report, which shall not be implied from the mere
fact of publication. In no event shall any owner, licensee, or operator of a
visual or sound radio broadcasting station or network of stations, or the
agents or employees thereof, be liable for prosecution for any defamatory
matter or statement published or uttered in such radio or television broadcast
where the publication cannot be censored by reason of the provisions of
federal statute or the regulations of the federal communications commission.
